Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. State Medical Board.

Administrative Code. —

For state medical board, see 12 AAC 40.

Sec. 08.64.010.
Creation and membership of State Medical Board.

The governor shall appoint a board of medical examiners, to be known as the State Medical Board, consisting of five physicians licensed in the state and residing in as many separate geographical areas of the state as possible, one physician assistant licensed under AS

08.64.107

, and two persons with no direct financial interest in the health care industry.

History.

(§ 35-3-82 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 11 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2001)

Sec. 08.64.020.
Term of office. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.035.]

Sec. 08.64.030.
Substitution of members. [Repealed, § 19 ch 48 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 08.64.040.
Removal of members. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.020.]

Sec. 08.64.050.
Oath of office.

Each member shall take an oath of office. The oath shall be filed and preserved in the department.

History.

(§ 35-3-83 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 15 ch 14 SLA 2005)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 14, SLA 2005 (SB 52), see 2005 Senate Journal 42 — 43.

Sec. 08.64.060.
Seal.

The board shall adopt a seal.

History.

(§ 35-3-83 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 08.64.070.
Officers.

The board shall elect a president and secretary from among its members.
The president and secretary may administer oaths.

History.

(§ 35-3-83 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 1969)

Sec. 08.64.075.
Designees.

If this chapter authorizes a designee to perform a duty, the board may designate a single board member, the executive secretary, or another employee of the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

For continuing medical education, see 12 AAC 40, art. 3.

Sec. 08.64.080.
Meetings of board. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.64.085.
Meetings of the board.

The board shall meet at least four times a year.

History.

(§ 6 ch 48 SLA 1983)

Sec. 08.64.090.
Quorum.

Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business properly before the board.

History.

(§ 35-3-83 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 13 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 2001)

Sec. 08.64.100.
Power of board to adopt regulations.

The board may adopt regulations necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 35-3-95 ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

For continuing medical education, see 12 AAC 40, art. 3.

For mobile intensive care paramedics, see 12 AAC 40, art. 4.

For physician assistants, see 12 AAC 40, art. 5.

For registered nurse anesthetists, see 12 AAC 44, art. 5.

Sec. 08.64.101.
Duties.

The board shall

except as provided in regulations adopted by the board under (b) of this section, examine and issue licenses to applicants;

develop written guidelines to ensure that licensing requirements are not unreasonably burdensome and the issuance of licenses is not unreasonably withheld or delayed;

after a hearing, impose disciplinary sanctions on persons who violate this chapter or the regulations or orders of the board;

adopt regulations ensuring that renewal of licenses is contingent on proof of continued competency on the part of the licensee;

under regulations adopted by the board, contract with private professional organizations to establish an impaired medical professionals program to identify, confront, evaluate, and treat persons licensed under this chapter who abuse alcohol, other drugs, or other substances or are mentally ill or cognitively impaired;

adopt regulations that establish guidelines for a physician or physician assistant who is rendering a diagnosis, providing treatment, or prescribing, dispensing, or administering a prescription drug to a person without conducting a physical examination under AS

08.64.364

; the guidelines must include a nationally recognized model policy for standards of care of a patient who is at a different location than the physician or physician assistant;

require that a licensee who has a federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number register with the controlled substance prescription database under AS

17.30.200(n)

.

The board may adopt regulations authorizing

the executive secretary to grant a license to an applicant under this chapter; the regulations must provide

that the applicant meet the requirements provided under this chapter;

that the executive secretary may not grant a license under this chapter if the applicant has submitted

a list of one or more negotiated settlements and judgments under AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

;

information that the applicant had a license to practice medicine in another state, country, province, or territory that was suspended or revoked under AS

08.64.200(a)(4)

; or

information that requires consideration by the board;

other requirements that the board determines necessary; and

a member of the board, the executive secretary, or a person designated by the board to issue a temporary permit under AS

08.64.270(a)

or

08.64.275(a)

if the applicant meets the requirements established under this chapter.

History.

(§ 7 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1992; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 25 SLA 2016; am §§ 2, 3 ch 45 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Former paragraphs (4) — (6) were renumbered as (3) — (5) in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (3).

Administrative Code. —

For continuing medical education, see 12 AAC 40, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (6), and effective July 17, 2017, added (7).

The 2019 amendment, effective March 1, 2020, inserted “or physician assistant” in two places in (a)(6).

Editor's notes. —

The delayed repeal of paragraph (7) of this section by sec. 52,
ch. 25, SLA 2016, which was to take effect July 1, 2021, was repealed by sec. 47,
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017.

Sec. 08.64.103.
Investigator; executive secretary.

After consulting with the board, the department shall employ two persons who are not members of the board; one shall be assigned as the investigator for the board; the other shall be assigned as the executive secretary for the board. The investigator shall

conduct investigations into alleged violations of this chapter and into alleged violations of regulations and orders of the board;

at the request of the board, conduct investigations based on complaints filed with the department or with the board; and

be directly responsible and accountable to the board, except that only the department has authority to terminate the investigator’s employment and the department shall provide day to day and administrative supervision of the investigator.

The executive secretary is the principal executive officer of the board and shall perform duties as prescribed by the board. The executive secretary is in the partially exempt service under AS

39.25.120

and is entitled to receive a monthly salary equal to a step in Range 23 on the salary schedule set out in AS

39.27.011(a)

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 2013)

Sec. 08.64.105.
Regulation of abortion procedures.

The board shall adopt regulations necessary to carry into effect the provisions of AS

18.16.010

and shall define ethical, unprofessional, or dishonorable conduct as related to abortions, set standards of professional competency in the performance of abortions, and establish procedures and set standards for facilities, equipment, and care of patients in the performance of an abortion.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For abortions, see 12 AAC 40, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Separation of responsibilities in AS

18.16.010

is clear; the approval of facilities is granted to the Department of Health and Social Services; the ethical and professional responsibilities of medical doctors are committed to the supervision of the State Medical Board. No language in this section vitiates any of the responsibilities granted in AS

18.16.010

(a)(2) to the Department of Health and Social Services. October 7, 1974 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 08.64.106.
Delegation of routine medical duties.

The board shall adopt regulations authorizing a physician, podiatrist, osteopath, or physician assistant licensed under this chapter to delegate routine medical duties to an agent of the physician, podiatrist, osteopath, or physician assistant. The regulations must

require that an agent who is not licensed under this chapter may perform duties delegated under this section only if the agent meets applicable standards established by the board;

require that a physician, podiatrist, osteopath, or physician assistant may not delegate duties related to pain management and opioid use and addiction; and

define the phrase “routine medical duties.”

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 45, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 08.64.107.
Regulation of physician assistants.

The board shall adopt regulations regarding the licensure of physician assistants and the medical services that they may perform, including the

educational and other qualifications, including education in pain management and opioid use and addiction;

application and licensing procedures;

scope of activities authorized; and

responsibilities of the supervising or training physician.

History.

(§ 2 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 2 SSSLA 2017; am § 3 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For certification of emergency medical personnel, see AS

18.08.082

.
For authority of physician assistants and mobile intensive care paramedics to pronounce death, see AS

18.08.089

.

For transitional provisions relating to the validity of a registration of a mobile intensive care paramedic issued before January 1, 2022, the conversion of an unexpired registration to a license, and the transfer from the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and the State Medical Board to the Department of Health and Social Services of all pending records and proceedings relating to mobile intensive care paramedics, see § 19, ch. 29, SLA 2021 in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For mobile intensive care paramedics, see 12 AAC 40, art. 4.

For physician assistants, see 12 AAC 40, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added “, including education in pain management and opioid use and addiction” at the end of (1).

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in the introductory language, deleted “and registration of mobile intensive care paramedics,” following “licensure of physician assistants”; in (2), substituted “licensing” for “registration” following “application and”.

Sec. 08.64.110.
Per diem and expenses.

The members of the board are entitled to per diem and expenses authorized by law.

History.

(§ 35-3-95 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 08.64.120.
Coverage of funds and warrants for expenses. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.64.130.
Board records.

The board shall preserve a record of its proceedings, which must contain the name, age, residence, and duration of residence of each applicant for a license, the time spent by the applicant in medical study, the place of medical study, and the year and school from which degrees were granted. The record must also show whether the applicant was granted a license or rejected.

The board shall maintain records for each person licensed under this chapter concerning the outcome of malpractice actions and claims as reported under AS

08.64.200(a)

and

08.64.345

. The board shall periodically review these records to determine if the licensee should be found to be professionally incompetent under AS

08.64.326(a)(8)(A)

.

The board shall make available to the public the information maintained under (a) and (b) of this section for each person licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 35-3-84 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 126 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.64.140.
Annual report to governor. [Repealed, § 19 ch 48 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 08.64.150.
Bond of secretary-treasurer. [Repealed, § 28 ch 77 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 08.64.160.
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act.

The board shall comply with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)